Massachusetts, session 194th, S1750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws, as so appearing, are hereby amended in Chapter 41 by adding the
following:-
Section 97D1/2. The attorney general in coordination with the secretary of the office of
public safety and security shall develop and promulgate guidelines by no later than July 1, 2026
to all district attorneys regarding rights of persons to ask and know about prior reports and
instances of abuse as defined in section 1 of chapter 209A perpetrated by their intimate partner,
ex-partner, or household member. Said guidelines shall include streamlined and simplified
procedures for a person to seek a disclosure and reasonable, as well as standards of review for a
request which shall include determining (i) that the disclosure is necessary to protect the person
from being the victim of a crime, (ii) that there is a pressing need for the disclosure, and (iii) that
of 2

the interference with the perpetrator’s rights is necessary and proportionate for the prevention of
crime. The guidelines shall provide that pursuant to a request for disclosure, district attorneys
may lawfully disclose information about violent or abusive behavior of a person that may
threaten the safety of that person’s current or ex-partner. Said information may be arising from a
criminal investigation, through agency involvement, or from another source of police
intelligence.
of 2